Washington statutes.
RCW 32.04.035

Agency agreements—Written notice to director.

On or before the date on which a mutual savings bank enters into any agency agreement authorizing another entity, as agent of the mutual savings bank, to receive deposits or renew time deposits, the mutual savings bank shall give written notice to the director of the existence of the agency agreement. The notice is not effective until it has been delivered to the office of the director.

[ 1996 c 2 s 22.]